Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 7
Hazardous Substances

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

Cross References.

Low-level radioactive waste, § 8-7-601 et seq., § 8-8-201 et seq.

Hazardous Materials Transportation Act of 1977, § 27-2-101 et seq.

8-7-101. Civil liability of those assisting at accidents — Definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Discharge” means spillage, leakage, seepage, fire, explosion, or other release; and

“Hazardous materials” means all materials and substances which are designated or defined as hazardous by law or rule of this state or by law or regulation of the United States Government.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other entity shall be liable in civil damages as a result of acts taken, voluntarily and without compensation, in the course of rendering care, assistance, or advice with respect to an incident creating a danger to person, property, or the environment as a result of an actual or threatened discharge of hazardous materials, or in preventing, cleaning up, disposing of, or attempting to prevent, clean up, or dispose of any such discharge.

This section shall not preclude liability for civil damages as the result of gross negligence. Reckless, willful, or wanton misconduct shall constitute gross negligence.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 913, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 82-4225 — 82-4227; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 597.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (a)(2).

Cross References.

Donation of property or equipment, immunity, § 12-75-125.

Emergency Management Assistance Compact, § 12-76-201 et seq.

Emergency responders, immunities and exemptions, § 12-75-128.

Exemption for requested assistance, § 16-120-401.

Good Samaritan law, § 17-95-101.

Interstate Civil Defense and Disaster Compact, § 12-76-101 et seq.

Liability for costs — Immunity from liability, § 8-7-512.

Limitations on civil liability for volunteer health practitioners, § 12-87-111.

Subchapter 2
— Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1981, No. 523, § 7, provided that this act shall not repeal Acts 1979, No. 406 (§ 8-7-201 et seq.), either in whole or in part.

Acts 1997, No. 1219, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent. With Act 1230 of 1991, the General Assembly sought to delineate the respective responsibilities of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission and the Arkansas Department of Pollution Control & Ecology. Confusion on these issues in the public's perception continues, however, primarily because of the similarity in the names of these entities. The purpose of this Act is to achieve the legislative intent of Act 1230 of 1991 and to definitively assign the executive, adjudicatory, and rulemaking roles for the State's regulatory functions concerning protection of the environment.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 19: Mar. 14, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and it is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is essential to the health, welfare and safety of the people of the State of Arkansas and to the minimizing of environmental damage that hazardous wastes be managed in an environmentally sound manner; that the knowledge and technology necessary for alleviating adverse health, environmental, and esthetic impacts resulting from current hazardous waste management and disposal practices are generally available at costs within the financial capabilities of those who generate such wastes, but that such knowledge and technology are not widely used; that existing practices and laws are inadequate; that this act and the implementation thereof are necessary to the accomplishment of the proper management of hazardous wastes and to the welfare of the State of Arkansas and her people. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 920, § 3: Apr. 15, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that inequities now exist in the regulation of hazardous waste management in this state as a result of the permit term currently utilized, and it is essential to the health, welfare and safety of the people of the State of Arkansas and to the minimizing of environmental damage that hazardous wastes be managed in a sound manner which includes providing a sufficiently long permit term to insure that the proper investment of resources will be made in hazardous waste management facilities to provide for the proper management of hazardous wastes and to protect the welfare of the State of Arkansas and her people. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 435, § 5: Mar. 11, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Federal Environmental Protection Agency, Region 6, has indicated that the authorization for the hazardous waste management program for the State of Arkansas may be jeopardized for failure to provide court assessment of reasonable attorney fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred by a substantially prevailing complainant in an action against the state for failure to comply with the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act in cases involving the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976 or other hazardous waste issues. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 1057, § 9: Apr. 9, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the 78th General Assembly that the sanctions imposed by current Arkansas law for environmental violations are among the least stringent in the nation. Thus, current law is inadequate to deter environmental violations, and in fact extends an implicit invitation to irresponsible industries. Protection of the environmental integrity of this state is essential to protect the public's health and economic well-being. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 1235, § 5: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1991, is essential to the operation of the Hazardous Waste Management Program within the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1991, could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of the essential government programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1993, No. 1254, § 9: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this act are of critical importance to the state's ability to provide efficient and effective programs in the protection of the state's environment as mandated through the activities of the Department of Pollution Control and Ecology. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 340, § 6: Mar. 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the provisions of the current statutes deny interim status to newly-regulated hazardous waste treatment, storage, and disposal facilities otherwise entitled to operate under federal laws and regulations. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 1166, § 2: Mar. 22, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that a decision of the Arkansas Supreme Court has called into question the authority of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality to enforce provisions of hazardous waste management permits; that this authority is necessary for the department to receive delegation from the United States Environmental Protection Agency to administer the federal hazardous waste management permit program; and that this act is immediately necessary to allow the State of Arkansas to continue to administer the federal hazardous waste management permit program, to continue to receive federal grants, and to prevent the State of Arkansas from losing approximately one million dollars ($1,000,000) in federal grant money. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Act 2005, No. 1824, § 20: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly of the State of Arkansas hereby finds and determines that the decision of the Arkansas Supreme Court in Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality v. Brighton Corp. 352 Ark. 396, 102 S.W.3d 458 (2003), has raised questions regarding the factual proof required to establish a claim for cost recovery under the Arkansas Remedial Action Trust Fund Act and regarding the retroactivity of the statute. The General Assembly further finds and determines that the doubts raised by the decision in the Brighton case have created substantial uncertainty regarding the enforcement authority of the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality and the rights and responsibilities of private parties under the Arkansas Remedial Action Trust Fund Act, all of which require urgent resolution. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist; and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005, and shall apply retroactively.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-7-201. Title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979”.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4201.

8-7-202. Purpose.

It is the purpose of this subchapter and it is declared to be the policy of this state to:

Protect the public health and safety, the health of living organisms, and the environment from the effects of the improper, inadequate, or unsound management of hazardous waste;

Establish a program of regulation over the generation, storage, transportation, treatment, and disposal of hazardous waste;

Assure the safe and adequate management of hazardous waste within this state;

Qualify the Division of Environmental Quality to adopt, administer, and enforce a hazardous waste program pursuant to the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq.; and

Afford the people of the State of Arkansas a voice in the permitting of hazardous waste facilities within their respective counties.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4202; Acts 1989, No. 643, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 89; 2019, No. 910, § 2707.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (4).

8-7-203. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

“Disposal” means the discharge, deposit, injection, dumping, spilling, leaking, or placing of any hazardous waste into or on any land or water in whatever manner so that such hazardous waste or any constituent thereof might or might not enter the environment or be emitted into the air or discharged into any waters including groundwaters;

“Facility” means any land and appurtenances thereon and thereto used for the treatment, storage, or disposal of hazardous waste;

“Generation” means the act or process of producing waste materials;

“Hazardous waste” means any waste or combination of wastes of a solid, liquid, contained gaseous, or semisolid form which, because of its quantity, concentration, or physical, chemical, or infectious characteristics, may in the judgment of the Division of Environmental Quality:

Cause or significantly contribute to an increase in mortality or an increase in serious irreversible or incapacitating reversible illness; or

Pose a substantial present or potential hazard to human health or the environment when improperly treated, stored, transported, or disposed of, or otherwise improperly managed.

“Hazardous waste” includes, but is not limited to, those which are radioactive, toxic, corrosive, flammable, irritants, or strong sensitizers or those which generate pressure through decomposition, heat, or other means;

“Hazardous waste management” means the systematic control of the generation, collection, distribution, marketing, source separation, storage, transportation, processing, recovery, disposal, and treatment of hazardous waste;

“Manifest” means the form used for identifying the quantity, composition, and the origin, routing, and destination of hazardous waste during its transport;

“Person” means any individual, corporation, company, firm, partnership, association, trust, joint-stock company, state agency, government instrumentality or agency, institution, county, city, town, or municipal authority or trust, venture, or any other legal entity, however organized;

“Site” means any real property located within the boundary of the State of Arkansas contemplated or later acquired for the purpose of, but not limited to, landfills or other facilities to be used for treatment, storage, disposal, or generation of hazardous waste;

“Storage” means the containment of hazardous waste, either on a temporary basis or for a period of years, in such a manner as not to constitute disposal of hazardous waste.

Storage by means of burial shall be deemed to constitute disposal within the meaning of this subchapter;

“Transport” means the movement of wastes from the point of generation to any intermediate points and finally to the point of ultimate storage or disposal;

“Treatment” means any method, technique, or process, including neutralization, designed to change the physical, chemical, or biological character or composition of any hazardous waste so as to neutralize the hazardous waste or to render the hazardous waste less hazardous, safer for transport, amenable to recovery, amenable to storage, amenable to disposal, or reduced in volume; and

“Treatment facility” means a location at which waste is subjected to treatment and may include a facility where waste has been generated.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4203; Acts 1989, No. 643, § 2; 1993, No. 994, § 2; 1997, No. 1219, § 9; 1999, No. 1164, § 90; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2708, 2709.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment repealed (2) and (3); and substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “department” in the introductory language of (7)(A).

8-7-204. Criminal, civil, and administrative penalties.

Criminal Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this subchapter, who commits any unlawful act under this subchapter, or who violates any rule or order of the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission or the Division of Environmental Quality shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of Arkansas law, upon conviction that person shall be subject to imprisonment for not more than one (1) year or a fine of not more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), or subject to both such fine and imprisonment. For the purpose of fines only, each day or part of a day during which the violation is continued or repeated shall constitute a separate offense.

It shall be unlawful for a person to:

Violate any provision of this subchapter, commit any unlawful act under this subchapter, or violate any rule or order of the commission or the division, and leave the state or remove his or her person from the jurisdiction of this state; or

Purposely or knowingly make any false statement, representation, or certification in any document required to be maintained under this subchapter or falsify, tamper with, or render inaccurate any monitoring device, method, or record required to be maintained under this subchapter.

A person who violates this subdivision (a)(2) shall be guilty of a felony. Notwithstanding any other provisions of Arkansas law, upon conviction that person shall be subject to imprisonment for not more than five (5) years or a fine of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or subject to both such fine and imprisonment. For the purpose of fines only, each day or part of a day during which the violation is continued or repeated shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person who treats, stores, transports, or disposes of any hazardous waste and purposely, knowingly, or recklessly causes the release of hazardous waste into the environment in a manner not otherwise permitted by law or creates a substantial likelihood of endangering human health, animal or plant life, or property shall be guilty of a felony.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of Arkansas law, upon conviction that person shall be subject to imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years or a fine of not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), or subject to both such fine and imprisonment. For the purpose of fines only, each day or part of a day during which the violation is continued or repeated shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person who treats, stores, transports, or disposes of any hazardous waste and purposely, knowingly, or recklessly causes the release of hazardous waste into the environment in a manner not otherwise permitted by law, thereby placing another person in imminent danger of death or serious bodily injury, shall be guilty of a felony.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of Arkansas law, upon conviction that person shall be subject to imprisonment for not more than twenty (20) years or a fine of not more than two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), or subject to both such fine and imprisonment. For the purpose of fines only, each day or part of a day during which the violation is continued or repeated shall constitute a separate offense.

Notwithstanding the limits on fines set in subdivisions (a)(1)-(4) of this section, if a person convicted under any of subdivisions (a)(1)-(4) of this section has derived pecuniary gain from commission of the offenses, then he or she may be sentenced to pay a fine not to exceed two (2) times the amount of the pecuniary gain.

Civil Penalties. The division may institute a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction to accomplish any of the following:

Restrain any violation of or compel compliance with the provisions of this subchapter and of any rules, orders, permits, or plans issued pursuant thereto;

Affirmatively order that remedial measures be taken as may be necessary or appropriate to implement or effectuate the purposes and intent of this subchapter;

Recover all costs, expenses, and damages to the division and any other agency or subdivision of the state in enforcing or effectuating the provisions of this subchapter, including, but not limited to, natural resource damages;

Assess civil penalties in an amount not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per day for violations of this subchapter and of any rules, permits, or plans issued pursuant to this subchapter; or

Recover civil penalties assessed pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

Any person who violates any provision of this subchapter and rules, permits, or plans issued pursuant to this subchapter may be assessed an administrative civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per violation. Each day of a continuing violation may be deemed a separate violation for purposes of civil penalty assessment. No civil penalty may be assessed until the person charged with the violation has been given the opportunity for a hearing in accordance with rules adopted by the commission. All hearings and appeals arising under this subchapter shall be conducted in accordance with the procedures prescribed by §§ 8-4-205, 8-4-212, and 8-4-218 — 8-4-229. The procedures of this subsection may also be used to recover all costs, expenses, and damages to the division and any other agency or subdivision of the state in enforcing or effectuating the provisions of this subchapter, including, but not limited to, natural resource damages.

As an alternative to the limits on civil penalties set in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, if a person found liable in actions brought under subsection (b) or subsection (c) of this section has derived pecuniary gain from commission of the offenses, then he or she may be ordered to pay a civil penalty equal to the amount of the pecuniary gain.

All moneys collected as reimbursement for expenses, costs, and damages to the division shall be deposited into the operating fund of the division.

All moneys collected as civil penalties pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Hazardous Substance Remedial Action Trust Fund as provided by § 8-7-509.

In his or her discretion, the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality may authorize in-kind services as partial mitigation of cash penalties for use in projects or programs designed to advance environmental interests.

The violator may provide in-kind services or cash contributions as directed by the division by utilizing the violator's own expertise, by hiring and compensating subcontractors to perform the in-kind services, by arranging and providing financing for the in-kind services, or by other financial arrangements initiated by the division in which the violator and the division retain no monetary benefit, however remote.

The in-kind services shall not duplicate or augment services already provided by the division through appropriations of the General Assembly.

All moneys collected to cover the costs, expenses, or damages of other agencies or subdivisions of the state, including natural resource damages, shall be distributed to the appropriate governmental entity.

The culpable mental states referenced throughout this section shall have the same definitions as set out in § 5-2-202.

Solicitation or conspiracy, as defined by the Arkansas Criminal Code at § 5-3-301 et seq. and § 5-3-401 et seq., to commit any criminal act proscribed by this section and §§ 8-4-103 and 8-6-204 shall be punishable as follows:

Any solicitation or conspiracy to commit an offense under this section which is a misdemeanor shall be a misdemeanor subject to fines not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per day of violation or imprisonment for more than six (6) months, or both such fine and imprisonment;

Any solicitation or conspiracy to commit an offense under this section which is a felony subject to fines of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per day or imprisonment up to five (5) years shall be a felony subject to fines up to thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) per day or imprisonment up to two (2) years, or both such fine and imprisonment;

Any solicitation or conspiracy to commit an offense under this section which is a felony subject to fines of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per day or imprisonment up to ten (10) years shall be a felony subject to fines up to seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) per day or imprisonment up to seven (7) years, or both such fine and imprisonment; and

Any solicitation or conspiracy to commit an offense under this section which is a felony subject to fines of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) per day or imprisonment up to twenty (20) years shall be a felony subject to fines up to one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) per day or imprisonment up to fifteen (15) years, or both such fine and imprisonment.

In cases considering suspension of sentence or probation, efforts or commitments by the defendant to remediate any adverse environmental effects caused by his or her activities may be considered by the court to be restitution as contemplated by § 5-4-301.

A business organization, its agents or officers, may be found liable under this section in accordance with the standards set forth in § 5-2-501 et seq. and sentenced to pay fines in accordance with the provisions of § 5-4-201(d) and (e).

For the purposes of this subchapter, the court may assess against the State of Arkansas reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred in any case under this subchapter in which the complainant has substantially prevailed in an action against the state for failure to comply with the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 13; 1983, No. 456, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4213; Acts 1989, No. 643, § 3; 1991, No. 435, § 1; 1991, No. 1057, §§ 2, 5; 1993, No. 731, § 2; 1995, No. 895, § 6; 2005, No. 1824, § 7; 2019, No. 315, §§ 598-602; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2710-2716.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1991, No. 1057, § 1, provided: “The General Assembly finds and determines that the criminal and civil penalties imposed by current law do not accurately reflect the degree of concern which the state places upon its environmental resources. The current criminal penalties for hazardous waste and other violations are among the lowest in the nation. Civil penalties for violations of the state water, air, solid waste and hazardous waste pollution control statutes are set at the minimum necessary to receive federally delegated programs. In declaring itself “The Natural State,” the State of Arkansas demonstrated its commitment to its environmental resources. This commitment must be reflected in its environmental enforcement program. This act shall be liberally construed so as to achieve remedial intent.”

Acts 1991, No. 1057, § 5, is also codified as §§ 8-4-103 (h)-(k) and 8-6-204 (f)-(i).

Acts 1993, No. 731, § 1 provided: “The state of Arkansas has an abundance of environmental concerns which need research and study, as well as concerns which have an immediate remedy but are absent funds to facilitate their implementation. This amendment serves to clarify the existing use of in-kind services as penalties, to include cash contributions for use in worthy environmental projects and to advance environmental interests.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (a)(1)(A) and (a)(2)(A)(i); in (b), deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (b)(1) and (b)(4); and, in (c), deleted “regulations” preceding “rules” in the first sentence, and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in the third sentence.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1)(A) and (e)(3)(A); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

8-7-205. Unlawful actions.

It shall be unlawful for any person to:

Violate any provisions of this subchapter or of any rule, permit, or order adopted or issued under this subchapter;

Knowingly make any false statement, representation, or certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained under this subchapter or falsify, tamper with, or knowingly render inaccurate any monitoring device or method required to be maintained under this subchapter or any rules adopted pursuant thereto;

Dispose of hazardous waste at any disposal site or facility other than one for which a permit has been issued by the Division of Environmental Quality pursuant to this subchapter; or

Store, collect, transport, treat, or dispose of any hazardous waste contrary to the rules, permits, or orders issued under this subchapter or in such a manner or place as to create or as is likely to be created a public nuisance or a public health hazard or to cause or is likely to cause water or air pollution within the meaning of the Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act, § 8-4-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4212; Acts 2019, No. 315, §§ 603, 604; 2019, No. 910, § 2717.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulation” following “rule” in (1); deleted “or regulations” following “rules” in (2); and deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (4).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (3).

8-7-206. Private right of action.

Any person adversely affected by a violation of this subchapter or of any rules or orders issued pursuant thereto shall have a private right of action for relief against such violation.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4215; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 605.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “regulations” following “rules”.

8-7-207. Venue for legal proceedings.

All legal proceedings affecting hazardous waste treatment or hazardous waste disposal facilities in this state shall be brought in the county in which the facility is located.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4216.

8-7-208. Official agency for program and agreements.

The Division of Environmental Quality is designated as the official agency for the state for all purposes of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq., and for the purpose of such other state or federal legislation as may be enacted to assist in the management of hazardous wastes.

The General Assembly encourages cooperative activities by the division with other states for the improved management of hazardous wastes and, so far as is practicable, uniform state laws relating to the management of hazardous wastes and compacts between this and other states for the improved management of hazardous wastes.

The division may enter into agreements with the responsible authorities of the United States or of other states, subject to approval by the Governor, relative to policies, methods, means, and procedures to be employed in the management of hazardous wastes not inconsistent with the provisions of this subchapter and may carry out such agreements.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 406, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-4210; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 2718.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b)(1) and (b)(2).